lv_LV/lv_LV.aff
SFX W Y 32
SFX W  s     ajai   [s]
SFX W  s     u      [s]
SFX W  s     ais    [s]
SFX W  s     am     [s]
SFX W  s     as     [s]
SFX W  s     ajiem  [s]
SFX W  s     ai     [s]
SFX W  s     ajā    [s]
SFX W  s     o      [s]
SFX W  s     ie     [s]
SFX W  s     ajās   [s]
SFX W  s     ā      [s]
SFX W  s     a      [s]
SFX W  s     ās     [s]
SFX W  s     ām     [s]
SFX W  s     ajos   [s]
SFX W  s     ajam   [s]
SFX W  s     ajām   [s]
SFX W  š     o      [š]
SFX W  š     ai     [š]
SFX W  š     ajam   [š]
SFX W  š     ajiem  [š]
SFX W  š     ajai   [š]
SFX W  š     ajā    [š]
SFX W  š     ie     [š]
SFX W  š     ām     [š]
SFX W  š     ais    [š]
SFX W  š     ajām   [š]
SFX W  š     ās     [š]
SFX W  š     as     [š]
SFX W  š     ajās   [š]
SFX W  š     ajos   [š]

SFX Y Y 42
SFX Y  s     āk      [s]
SFX Y  s     āks     [s]
SFX Y  s     āka     [s]
SFX Y  s     ākas    [s]
SFX Y  s     ākam    [s]
SFX Y  s     ākai    [s]
SFX Y  s     āku     [s]
SFX Y  s     ākā     [s]
SFX Y  s     āki     [s]
SFX Y  s     ākiem   [s]
SFX Y  s     ākām    [s]
SFX Y  s     ākus    [s]
SFX Y  s     ākos    [s]
SFX Y  s     ākās    [s]
SFX Y  š     āk      [š]
SFX Y  š     āks     [š]
SFX Y  š     āka     [š]
SFX Y  š     ākas    [š]
SFX Y  š     ākam    [š]
SFX Y  š     ākai    [š]
SFX Y  š     āku     [š]
SFX Y  š     ākā     [š]
SFX Y  š     āki     [š]
SFX Y  š     ākiem   [š]
SFX Y  š     ākām    [š]
SFX Y  š     ākus    [š]
SFX Y  š     ākos    [š]
SFX Y  š     ākās    [š]
SFX Y  0     tāk      [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tāks     [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tāka     [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tākas    [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tākam    [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tākai    [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tāku     [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tākā     [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tāki     [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tākiem   [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tākām    [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tākus    [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tākos    [āēīo]t
SFX Y  0     tākās    [āēīo]t



SFX X Y 20
SFX X  s     ākais   [s]
SFX X  s     ākajam  [s]
SFX X  s     ākajai  [s]
SFX X  s     āko     [s]
SFX X  s     ākajā   [s]
SFX X  s     ākie    [s]
SFX X  s     ākajiem [s]
SFX X  s     ākajām  [s]
SFX X  s     ākajos  [s]
SFX X  s     ākajās  [s]
SFX X  š     ākais   [š]
SFX X  š     ākajam  [š]
SFX X  š     ākajai  [š]
SFX X  š     āko     [š]
SFX X  š     ākajā   [š]
SFX X  š     ākie    [š]
SFX X  š     ākajiem [š]
SFX X  š     ākajām  [š]
SFX X  š     ākajos  [š]
SFX X  š     ākajās  [š]

SFX y Y 13
SFX y  ais   0       [a]is
SFX y  ais   ā       [a]is
SFX y  ais   ās      [a]is
SFX y  is    jam     [a]is
SFX y  is    jai     [a]is
SFX y  ais   o       [a]is
SFX y  is    jā      [a]is
SFX y  ais   ie      [a]is
SFX y  is    jiem    [a]is
SFX y  is    jām     [a]is
SFX y  ais   os      [a]is
SFX y  is    jos     [a]is
SFX y  is    jās     [a]is


SFX q Y 45
SFX q  i   u    [i]
SFX q  i   as   [i]
SFX q  i   iem  [i]
SFX q  i   ām   [i]
SFX q  i   ās   [i]
SFX q  i   os   [i]
SFX q  i   us   [i]
SFX q  ais  ā     [a]is
SFX q  ais  o     [a]is
SFX q  ais  ās    [a]is
SFX q  ais  os    [a]is
SFX q  ais  ie    [a]is
SFX q  is   jam   [a]is
SFX q  is   jā    [a]is
SFX q  is   jai   [a]is
SFX q  is   jiem  [a]is
SFX q  is   jos   [a]is
SFX q  is   jām   [a]is
SFX q  is   jās   [a]is
SFX q  0   ais   [t]
SFX q  0   ā     [t]
SFX q  0   o     [t]
SFX q  0   ās    [t]
SFX q  0   os    [t]
SFX q  0   ie    [t]
SFX q  0   ajam  [t]
SFX q  0   ajā   [t]
SFX q  0   ajai  [t]
SFX q  0   ajiem [t]
SFX q  0   ajos  [t]
SFX q  0   ajām  [t]
SFX q  0   ajās  [t]
SFX q  š   šais  [š]
SFX q  0   ā     [š]
SFX q  0   o     [š]
SFX q  0   ās    [š]
SFX q  0   os    [š]
SFX q  0   ie    [š]
SFX q  0   ajam  [š]
SFX q  0   ajā   [š]
SFX q  0   ajai  [š]
SFX q  0   ajiem [š]
SFX q  0   ajos  [š]
SFX q  0   ajām  [š]
SFX q  0   ajās  [š]
